Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.500

Resolution declaring formation—Treasurer—Disbursement procedure.

If the formation of the service area is approved by the voters, the county legislative authority shall by resolution declare the service area to be formed and direct the county treasurer to be the treasurer of the service area. Expenditures of the service area shall be made upon warrants drawn by the county auditor pursuant to vouchers approved by the governing body of the service area.

[ 1981 c 210 s 9; 1963 c 218 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 210: See note following RCW 36.68.400.